src/verb-eng-morph.txt
LEXICON vs 
+V+Inf: # ;
+V+Prs: # ;
+V+Prs+Sg3:%>es # ;
+V+Prt:%>ed # ;
+V+Prog:%>ing # ;


! Irregular verbs

LEXICON BE
+V+Inf:be # ;
+V+Prs+Sg1:am # ;
+V+Prs+Sg2:are # ;
+V+Prs+Sg3:is # ;
+V+Prs+Pl:are # ;
+V+Prt+Sg:was # ;
+V+Prt+Pl:were # ;
+V+Prog:being # ;

LEXICON HAVE
+V+Inf:have # ;
+V+Prs+Sg1:have # ;
+V+Prs+Sg2:have # ;
+V+Prs+Sg3:hass # ;
+V+Prs+Pl:have # ;
+V+Prt:had # ;
+V+Prog:having # ;

! Strong verbs
